Nebraska statutes.
Revised Statutes Cumulative Supplement, 202616-1011
Police officer; disability in the line of duty; benefit; requirements.

(1) For purposes of this section, disability means the complete inability of the police officer, for reasons of accident or other cause while in the line of duty, to perform the duties of a police officer.

(2) If any police officer becomes disabled, such police officer shall be placed upon the roll of pensioned police officers at the regular retirement pension of fifty percent of regular pay for the period of such disability.

(3)(a) No disability benefit payment shall be made except upon adequate proof furnished to the city. Such proof shall include a medical examination conducted by a competent, disinterested physician who is duly licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this state and who certifies to the city that the police officer is unable to perform the duties of a police officer.

(b) The city, during the first three years of the payment of such benefits, shall have the right, at reasonable times, to require the disabled police officer to undergo a medical examination at the city's expense to determine the continuance of the disability claimed.

(c) After such three-year period, the city may request the district court to order the police officer to submit proof of the continuance of the disability claimed if the city has reasonable grounds to believe the police officer is fraudulently receiving disability payments.

(d) The city shall have the right to demand a physical examination of the police officer by a competent, disinterested physician who is duly licensed to practice medicine and surgery in this state, and who is chosen by the city. The expense of such examination shall be borne by the city.

(4) In case of temporary disability of a police officer received while in the line of duty, such police officer shall receive such police officer's salary during the continuance of such disability for a period not to exceed twelve months. If the city council or other proper municipal authorities determine that such temporary disability has become a disability during such period, then the salary shall cease and such police officer shall be entitled to the benefits for pensions in case of disability as provided in this section.

(5)(a) All payments of pension or salary provided by this section shall be subject to deduction of amounts paid under the Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act. In case of a permanent disability of a police officer, such payments shall not commence until all credit for unused annual or sick leave and other similar credits have been fully utilized by the disabled police officer if there will be no impairment to such police officer's salary during the period of disability.

(b) Total payments to a disabled police officer, in excess of amounts paid as workers' compensation benefits, shall not be less than the retirement value at the date of disability.

(c) If the actuarial equivalent of the disability pension payable under this section exceeds the police officer's retirement value at the time of the first payment, the city shall contribute such additional amounts as may be necessary, from time to time, to provide for the required disability pension.

(6) If a police officer who was pensioned under this section is later determined to be no longer disabled, the pension provided for under this section shall terminate and the police officer's vested retirement value, as reduced by any disability payments made from the retirement system, shall thereafter be held and administered in the same manner as for any nondisabled police officer or former police officer.

(7)(a) If a police officer who has pensioned under this section is later determined to be no longer disabled during the first three years when disability benefit payments are being paid, the police officer may return to duty with the police force under the following conditions:

(i) If a vacancy exists on the police force for which the police officer is qualified and the police officer wishes to return to the police force, the city shall hire the police officer to fill the vacancy at a pay grade of not less than such police officer's previous pay grade; or

(ii) If no vacancy exists on the police force and the police officer wishes to return to the police force, the city may create a vacancy under the city's reduction in force policy adopted under the Civil Service Act and rehire the officer at a pay grade of not less than such police officer's previous pay grade.

(b) This subsection shall not apply to a police officer whose disability benefit payments are terminated because of fraud on the part of the police officer.

Laws 1983, LB 237, § 11;

Laws 1986, LB 811, § 4;

Laws 1992, LB 672, § 15;

Laws 2013, LB263, § 1;

Laws 2026, LB822, § 11.
July 18, 2026
Civil Service Act, see section 19-1825.

Nebraska Workers' Compensation Act, see section 48-1,110.